District of Columbia statutes.
8-115.07

Permit requirements.

(a)

Prior to conducting a lead-based paint abatement as defined in § 8-115.01(1)(A) [repealed], business entities and individuals shall obtain a permit from the Mayor. To obtain a permit, an application shall be submitted to the Mayor for approval with the appropriate fee. The application shall contain the following information:

(1)

The location of the lead-based paint abatement project;

(2)

The starting and completion dates of the lead-based paint abatement;

(3)

The approximate amount of lead-based paint or lead-based paint containing materials to be abated;

(4)

The method of abatement to be employed;

(5)

The provisions for medical surveillance and worker protection;

(6)

The manner in which the waste containing lead will be disposed and location of the disposal site;

(7)

A description of the areas immediately adjacent to the abatement site;

(8)

Proof of certification, pursuant to § 8-115.05, of the business entity and of all individuals who will be engaging in the lead-based paint abatement; and

(9)

Any other information required by the Mayor through the formal rulemaking and regulatory process of § 8-115.14.

(b)

A permit fee determined by the Mayor shall be assessed for each lead-based paint abatement project. The Mayor may by rulemaking revise permit fees as necessary to recover the costs of administering and enforcing this subchapter. Permits shall be valid for a period not to exceed one year from the date of issuance. Each permit shall be limited to one site and shall not be transferable to another site.

(c)

A single application and permit shall be sufficient for an entire abatement project. Separate permits for each unit or building are not required as long as the units and buildings are located on the same real property.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 8, 43 DCR 6854
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-347, § 2(h), 52 DCR 2627
1981 Ed., § 6-997.7.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-204, October 17, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 10460).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead Based Paint Abatement and Control Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-28, September 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 8351).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead Based Paint Abatement and Control Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-180, September 8, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 9222).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-397, June 25, 2002, 49 DCR 6511).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-478, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-89, May 19, 2003, 50 DCR 4334).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead-based Paint Abatement and Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-125, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6641).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-411, April 21, 2004, 51 DCR 4677).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Lead-based Paint Abatement and Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-468, July 19, 2004, 51 DCR 7587).
Section 21(b) of D.C. Law 17-381 provided that section 8 shall be deemed repealed upon issuance of rules by the Mayor under this act regarding abatement permit requirements.